Utah statutes.
53A-3-204.   Duties of president.
(1)  The president of each local school board shall preside at all meetings of
the board, appoint all committees, and sign all warrants ordered by the board
to be drawn upon the business administrator for school money.
(2)  If the president is absent or disabled, these duties are performed by the
vice-president.
